Utah statutes.
7-1-302.   Review of supervisor's action by commissioner.

The commissioner shall review, upon written request of the institution or other person affected, any act or order of a supervisor and may suspend, modify, or revoke any such act or order as he may find to be arbitrary, capricious, contrary to law or the rules and regulations of the department, or not in the best interest of the public or of the state.

